Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3503
Board of trustees; compensation; mileage.

The salary of the members of the board of trustees of such facility or facilities as provided by section 23-3501 shall be fixed by an order of the county board of such county. The county board may establish a salary in an amount not less than one hundred dollars per year but not more than one hundred dollars per meeting of the board of trustees and not to exceed one thousand two hundred dollars per year. The members shall also be reimbursed for necessary mileage at the rate provided in section 81-1176 while on business of the facility or facilities.

Laws 1945, c. 44, § 3, p. 209;

Laws 1963, c. 114, § 3, p. 449;

Laws 1967, c. 121, § 3, p. 387;

Laws 1978, LB 719, § 1;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 22;

Laws 1989, LB 135, § 1;

R.S.Supp.,1990, § 23-343.02;

Laws 1996, LB 1011, § 16.